sk-SK: Konfigurácia dronu pre škótske gajdy: 1 barytónová + 1 tenorová + 1 basová; 1 tenorová + 1 basová; 2 basové + 1 tenorová; 2 tenorové + 1 basová (štandard); Iné
th: รูปแบบท่อของปี่สก็อตไฮแลนด์: 1 บาริโทน + 1 เทเนอร์ + 1 เบส; 1 เทเนอร์ + 1 เบส; 2 เบส + 1 เทเนอร์; 2 เทเนอร์ + 1 เบส (มาตรฐาน); อื่นๆ
nl: Great Highland-doedelzak droneconfiguratie: 1 bariton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 bas + 1 tenor; 2 tenoren + 1 bas (standaard); Overig
ja: グレートハイランドバグパイプのドローン構成: 1 バリトン + 1 テナー + 1 バス; 1 テナー + 1 バス; 2 バス + 1 テナー; 2 テナー + 1 バス (標準); その他
ko: 그레이트 하이랜드 백파이프 드론 구성: 바리톤 1개 + 테너 1개 + 베이스 1개; 테너 1개 + 베이스 1개; 베이스 2개 + 테너 1개; 테너 2개 + 베이스 1개(표준); 기타
hu: Great Highland duda drón konfiguráció: 1 bariton + 1 tenor + 1 basszus; 1 tenor + 1 basszus; 2 basszus + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 basszus (standard); Egyéb
pt-PT: Configuração de drone da gaita de foles das Terras Altas: 1 barítono + 1 tenor + 1 baixo; 1 tenor + 1 baixo; 2 baixos + 1 tenor; 2 tenores + 1 baixo (padrão); Outra
sv: Dronekonfiguration för Great Highland-säckpipa: 1 baryton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 bas + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 bas (standard); Övrigt
fr: Configuration des bourdons de la grande cornemuse écossaise: 1 baryton + 1 ténor + 1 basse; 1 ténor + 1 basse; 2 basses + 1 ténor; 2 ténors + 1 basse (standard); Autre
pt-BR: Gaita de foles Great Highland configuração dos bordões: 1 barítono + 1 tenor + 1 baixo; 1 tenor + 1 baixo; 2 baixos + 1 tenor; 2 tenores + 1 baixo (padrão); Outra
nb: Dronekonfigurasjon for sekkepipe fra Great Highland: 1 baryton + 1 tenor + 1 bass; 1 tenor + 1 bass; 2 bass + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 bass (standard); Annet
hr-HR: Konfiguracija dronova za gajde Great Highland: 1 bariton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 basa + 1 tenor; 2 tenora + 1 bas (standardno); Ostalo
bg-BG: Конфигурация на бурдоните на гайда Great Highland: 1 баритон + 1 тенор + 1 бас; 1 тенор + 1 бас; 2 баса + 1 тенор; 2 тенора + 1 бас (стандартно); Друго
zh-TW: 蘇格蘭高地風笛持續音管配置: 1 個上低音 + 1 個次中音 + 1 個低音; 1 個次中音 + 1 個低音; 2 個低音 + 1 個次中音; 2 個次中音 + 1 個低音 (標準); 其他
pl: Konfiguracja burdonów dud Great Highland: 1 barytonowy + 1 tenorowy + 1 basowy; 1 tenorowy + 1 basowy; 2 basowe + 1 tenorowy; 2 tenorowe + 1 basowy (standard); Inne
vi: Cấu hình ống thổi kèn túi Great Highland: 1 baritone + 1 tenor + 1 bass; 1 tenor + 1 bass; 2 bass + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 bass (tiêu chuẩn); Khác
ru: Конфигурация бурдонов волынки Great Highland: 1 баритон + 1 тенор + 1 бас; 1 тенор + 1 бас; 2 баса + 1 тенор; 2 тенора + 1 бас (стандарт); Другое
de: Bordunkonfiguration der Great Highland Bagpipes: 1 Bariton + 1 Tenor + 1 Bass; 1 Tenor + 1 Bass; 2 Bass + 1 Tenor; 2 Tenor + 1 Bass (Standard); Sonstige
lt-LT: Great Highland dūdmaišio burdonų konfigūracija: 1 baritonas + 1 tenoras + 1 bosas; 1 tenoras + 1 bosas; 2 bosai + 1 tenoras; 2 tenorai + 1 bosas (standartinė); Kita
ro-RO: Configurația dronelor pentru cimpoiul Great Highland.: 1 bariton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 bas + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 bas (standard); Altele
tr: Great Highland gayda drone konfigürasyonu: 1 bariton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 bas + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 bas (standart); Diğer
da: Konfiguration af bordunrør på Great Highland-sækkepibe: 1 baryton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 bas + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 bas (standard); Andet
fi: Great Highland ‑säkkipillin bordunaputket: 1 baritoni + 1 tenori + 1 basso; 1 tenori + 1 basso; 2 bassoa + 1 tenori; 2 tenoria + 1 basso (vakio); Muu
zh-CN: 苏格兰高地风笛低音管配置: 1 个上低音 + 1 个次中音 + 1 个低音; 1 个次中音 + 1 个低音; 2 个低音 + 1 个次中音; 2 个次中音 + 1 个低音（标准）; 其他
el: Διαμόρφωση drone για γκάιντες Great Highland: 1 βαρύτονο + 1 τενόρο + 1 μπάσο; 1 τενόρο + 1 μπάσο; 2 μπάσα + 1 τενόρο; 2 τενόρα + 1 μπάσο (τυπικό); Άλλο
es: Configuración de bordones de la gran gaita de las Highlands: 1 barítono + 1 tenor + 1 bajo; 1 tenor + 1 bajo; 2 bajos + 1 tenor; 2 tenores + 1 bajo (estándar); Otro
cs: Konfigurace bordunů pro dudy Great Highland: 1 baryton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 basy + 1 tenor; 2 tenory + 1 bas (standardní); Ostatní
en: Great Highland bagpipes drone configuration: 1 baritone + 1 tenor + 1 bass; 1 tenor + 1 bass; 2 bass + 1 tenor; 2 tenor + 1 bass (standard); Other
it: Configurazione del bordone della cornamusa scozzese: 1 baritono + 1 tenore + 1 basso; 1 tenore + 1 basso; 2 bassi + 1 tenore; 2 tenori + 1 basso (standard); Altro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija dordonskih cevi škotskih dud: 1 bariton + 1 tenor + 1 bas; 1 tenor + 1 bas; 2 basa + 1 tenor; 2 tenorja + 1 bas (standardno); Drugo